Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 3 Committees
Subchapter 3

— Legislative Council

10-3-301. Creation — Members.

An ad interim committee of the General Assembly is hereby established as the “Legislative Council” to consist of the following:

(1)In order that there may be no vacancies on the Legislative Council at any time, at the time the members are selected to the Legislative Council by the Senate and by the House, there shall also be selected, in the same manner, one (1) first alternate member and one (1) second alternate member for each regular member.

(A)First alternate members shall also be nonvoting members of the Legislative Council and shall be entitled to per diem and mileage for attending all meetings of the Legislative Council.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 264, § 1; 1951, No. 230, § 1; 1955, No. 247, § 1; 1959, No. 303, § 1; 1965, No. 411, § 1; 1967, No. 86, § 1; 1967, No. 107, § 1; 1971, No. 292, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-617, 4-617.1, 4-617.3; Acts 1987, No. 84, § 1; 1991, No. 832, § 2; 1993, No. 542, § 1; 1995, No. 608, § 1; 1995, No. 1149, § 1; 1995, No. 1312, §§ 16-18; 1995, No. 1350, § 2; 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 17; 1997, No. 1285, § 17; 1997, No. 1354, §§ 1, 3, 4, 46; 2001, No. 148, § 1; 2001, No. 288, § 1; 2001, No. 466, § 8; 2003, No. 1091, §§ 1, 3[5]; 2005, No. 2100, § 15; 2007, No. 319, § 1; 2007, No. 321, § 1.

10-3-302. Officers — Quorum.

(1)(A)The House of Representatives members of the Legislative Council shall select one (1) of their number as Legislative Council cochair and one (1) of their number as Legislative Council co-vice chair.

(1)Upon the request of any three (3) members of the Legislative Council, a separate vote of House members and Senate members shall be taken on any issue or matter brought before the Legislative Council and approval of each house shall be required for the action.

The adoption or amendment of the rules of the Legislative Council shall require approval by a separate vote of Senate Legislative Council members and House Legislative Council members.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 264, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-618; Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 47.

10-3-303. Bureau of Legislative Research.

There is established under the direction and control of the Legislative Council a Bureau of Legislative Research which shall consist of a director to be selected by the Legislative Council and other assistants as may be provided by legislative appropriation.

The Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research shall be the Executive Secretary to the Legislative Council and shall attend all of its meetings and keep official records of all Legislative Council proceedings.

It shall be the duty of the bureau acting under the direction of the director to:

Make studies and investigations, upon direction of the Legislative Council, and secure factual information, prepare reports, and draft legislation as may be required by the Legislative Council or any of its subcommittees;

Assist all members of the General Assembly upon request while the General Assembly is in regular session, fiscal session, or special session in drafting bills and resolutions, and making studies, preparing factual information, and by performing other services for members of the General Assembly as may be reasonably requested and which are in aid of the performance of the legislative duties of the members of the General Assembly;

Assist all members of the General Assembly when the General Assembly is not in session in connection with any reasonable request in preparing proposed bills or resolutions for introduction in the General Assembly when in session by compiling factual information, making studies, providing legal assistance, and performing other duties which assist members of the General Assembly in performing their official legislative duties;

(A)Maintain a limited legislative reference library service for legislative matters, utilizing print material, digital media, and information available through the internet. The bureau shall collect and make available in the most suitable form information relative to governmental subjects that will aid the General Assembly and bureau to perform their duties.

The agenda of each session of the Legislative Council shall be prepared by the director under the direction of the cochairs of the Legislative Council, and the agenda shall consist of any proposals as may be submitted by the members of the General Assembly, the Governor of the State of Arkansas, and such other matters as may be suggested by matters of public interest.

The bureau is a service agency within the legislative department of government and all members of the General Assembly shall have access thereto. The bureau shall be operated for the benefit of and the assistance to every member of the General Assembly to the end that legislative matters may be coordinated and the General Assembly assisted in its deliberations. The director and all employees of the bureau are declared to be employees of the General Assembly and shall be responsible to the General Assembly.

There is established the Executive Subcommittee of the Legislative Council to be composed of the following members:

The House and Senate cochairs of the Legislative Council;

The House and Senate co-vice chairs of the Legislative Council;

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate or one (1) senator selected by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;

The Speaker of the House of Representatives or one (1) representative selected by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;

The immediate past Senate Cochair of the Legislative Council or one (1) member designate appointed by the Senate Cochair of the Legislative Council; and

The immediate past House Cochair of the Legislative Council or one (1) member designate appointed by the House Cochair of the Legislative Council.

(1)The Executive Subcommittee of the Legislative Council may require the director to report and regularly seek the review and advice of the Executive Subcommittee of the Legislative Council prior to:

If the Executive Subcommittee of the Legislative Council approves the employment of outside legal counsel by the bureau, no additional approval is required.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 264, §§ 5, 10; 1965, No. 500, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-621, 4-626; Acts 2005, No. 2100, § 18; 2007, No. 18, § 1;
2007, No. 319, § 2; 2007, No. 665, § 1; 2009, No. 962, § 16; 2015, No. 1150, § 1; 2017, No. 737, § 11.

10-3-304. Sessions — Studies — Cooperation of state agencies.

The Legislative Council shall convene and hold its sessions at the State Capitol at the seat of government or at other places as the Legislative Council may determine, and ample notice of all sessions shall be given by the Executive Secretary to the Legislative Council in advance of the sessions.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 264, § 6; 1965, No. 500, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-622; Acts 2009, No. 962, § 17.

10-3-305. Hearings — Records — Rules.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 264, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-625.

10-3-306. Investigations — Witnesses — Recommendations.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 264, §§ 3, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-619, 4-620.

10-3-307. Submission of itemized budgets to Legislative Council.

All state agencies, departments, institutions, and offices shall submit to the Legislative Council a budget for their operation in the manner and at the times as requested by the Legislative Council. The Legislative Council shall ascertain the needs of each department of state government and all of its agencies, institutions, and offices; the number of employees required by each of them; and the necessary amount of money from public funds required to carry on the work or functions of any department, agency, institution, and office; and shall before each session of the General Assembly prepare and submit to the General Assembly an itemized budget for each department, agency, office, and institution supported by the state government.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 264, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-623.

10-3-308. Presession budget briefings — Compensation.

The Legislative Council is authorized to conduct or cause to be conducted budget briefings for members and members-elect of the General Assembly during the presession budget hearings conducted by the Legislative Council and the Joint Budget Committee preceding each regular session and fiscal session of the General Assembly for the purpose of informing interested members and members-elect of the General Assembly concerning budget requests, executive recommendations, and Legislative Council and Joint Budget Committee recommendations regarding the budgets for the various state agencies, institutions, departments, and programs.

If at any time during the Legislative Council and Joint Budget Committee hearings preceding each regular session and fiscal session of the General Assembly it appears that there is not sufficient interest or attendance by members and members-elect of the General Assembly to justify continuation of budget briefings, the cochairs and co-vice chairs of the Legislative Council are authorized to terminate any further briefings during that particular budget session.

Each member of the General Assembly who will serve during the upcoming regular session or fiscal session of the General Assembly and each member-elect of the General Assembly shall be entitled to attend the budget briefings conducted pursuant to the provisions of this section. Each member attending the budget briefings shall be entitled to per diem and mileage for attending briefings at the rate prescribed by law for members of the General Assembly who attend meetings of the interim committees of the General Assembly, to be payable from moneys appropriated for payment of per diem and mileage for attendance at meetings of interim committees.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “regular session and fiscal session” for “regular session” in (a)(1) and (a)(2); in (a)(2), substituted “Joint Budget Committee hearings” for “Committee biennial hearings,” and deleted “biennial” preceding “budget session”; and inserted “session or fiscal” following “regular” in the first sentence of (b).

Cross References. State accounting and budgetary procedures, authority of Legislative Council, §19-4-202.

“Rule” means a state agency statement of general applicability and future effect that implements, interprets, or prescribes law or policy or describes the organization, procedure, or practice of a state agency and includes without limitation the amendment or repeal of a prior rule.

“Rule” does not mean:

A statement that concerns the internal management of a state agency and that does not affect the private rights or procedures available to the public;

A declaratory order or ruling issued under § 25-15-206 or other provision of law applicable to the state agency issuing the declaratory order or ruling;

Intraagency memoranda; or

A medical code within the Arkansas Medicaid Program that is issued by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, including without limitation:

Current Procedural Terminology codes;

Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System codes;

International Classification of Diseases codes;

National Uniform Billing Committee Official UB-04 Data Specifications Manual codes; and

National Correct Coding Initiative codes; and

A committee or subcommittee under this section may vote to not approve a rule under this section only if the rule is inconsistent with:

State or federal law; or

Legislative intent.

A committee or subcommittee under this section voting not to approve a rule under this section shall state the grounds under subdivision (f)(1) of this section when not approving a rule.

A committee or subcommittee under this section considering a rule submitted in accordance with § 20-7-604(d)(2)(D), concerning exemptions from the Prescription Drug Monitoring Program, is not required to state the grounds required under subdivision (f)(1) of this section when not approving a rule.

The Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council, the Legislative Council, the Administrative Rule Review Subcommittee, or the Joint Budget Committee may refer a rule to a committee of the General Assembly for the committee's consideration.

After the referred rule is presented to a committee of the General Assembly and considered, the committee to whom the rule was referred may provide its views and opinions on the rule to the committee or subcommittee that referred the rule.

The Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council, the Legislative Council, the Administrative Rule Review Subcommittee, or the Joint Budget Committee shall not delegate their authority to review or approve a rule under this section to a committee or subcommittee of the General Assembly or the Legislative Council.

The Legislative Council shall adopt rules to implement this section, including without limitation rules concerning:

The process for determining when a rule will be placed on the agendas of the Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council and the Legislative Council; and

The materials a state agency shall provide with the rule to aid committees and subcommittees under this section in their review and approval of the rule.

The Legislative Council may adopt rules amending the definition of “state agency” under subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this section to provide:

That the definition of “state agency” includes an agency of state government, including without limitation an agency of state government under subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this section; and

That the definition of “state agency” under this section does not include an agency of state government.

The review and approval of a rule under this section shall not be construed to:

Represent an expression by the General Assembly that the rule is consistent with:

State or federal law; or

Legislative intent; and

Have any effect in a judicial proceeding relating to the rule, including without limitation a judicial review of the rule under § 25-15-212 or other applicable provision of law.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 1258, § 1, provided: “LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The General Assembly finds:

“(1)Amendment 92 to the Arkansas Constitution states in part: ‘The General Assembly may provide by law for the review by a legislative committee of administrative rules promulgated by a state agency before the administrative rules become effective; and that administrative rules promulgated by a state agency shall not become effective until reviewed and approved by the legislative committee charged by law with the review of administrative rules under subdivision (a)(1) of this section’;

“(2)As Amendment 92 does not define the term ‘state agency’, the General Assembly may establish a definition by law as part of its implementation of Amendment 92;

“(3)The General Assembly at this time wishes to exclude the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, the State Highway Commission, the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department, and institutions of higher education from the definition of ‘state agency’ applied to the implementation of Amendment 92; and

“(4)The General Assembly or the Legislative Council reserve the right to amend the definition of ‘state agency’ in the future to include one (1) or all of the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, the State Highway Commission, the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department, and institutions of higher education.”

Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 1, § 1, provided: “This act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Arkansas Highway Improvement Plan of 2016’.”

Acts 2019 No. 319, § 1, provided: “Title. This act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Red Tape Reduction Collective Rulemaking Act of 2019’”.

Acts 2019, No. 319, § 2, provided: “Legislative findings and intent.

“(a)The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)Arkansas is taking a leading role in the nationwide pursuit of reforms to the system of occupational licensing;

“(2)Arkansas became one (1) of eleven (11) states chosen to participate in the Occupational Licensing Policy Learning Consortium, an initiative funded by a grant from the United States Department of Labor and supported in partnership with the National Conference of State Legislatures, the Council of State Governments, and the National Governors Association;

“(3)Governor Asa Hutchinson appointed seventeen (17) individuals to the Red Tape Reduction Working Group to review and address occupational licensing regulations that create unnecessary barriers to labor market entry; and

“(4)The Red Tape Reduction Working Group issued a final report to the Governor in the fall of 2018 with five (5) recommendations for substantive legislative reform, which are to:

“(A)Establish an expedited procedure for occupational licensing entities to collectively submit administrative rules that are responsive to new legislation;

“(B)Extend Acts 2017, No. 781, to allow repeal of subsections of rules;

“(C)Establish provisions to allow certain agencies to consider occupational relevance with regard to criminal background issues;

“(D)Authorize occupational licensing entities to identify types of individuals or entities that may be issued temporary or provisional licenses; and

“(E)Establish a systematic process for review of:

“(i)New occupational licensure and occupational licensing entities; and

“(ii)Existing occupational licensure and occupational licensing entities.

“(b)It is the intent of the General Assembly to establish an expedited procedure for occupational licensing entities to collectively submit administrative rules that are responsive to new legislation”.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1977, No. 100, referred to in this section is not codified since all of the actions required by that act were completed prior to the adoption of this code. The act may be found in the Appendix following this title.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment added (g).

The 2013 amendment in (e)(1)(B), substituted “as provided under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq.” for “determined by the agency” and substituted “without limitation” for “at a minimum”; deleted (e)(1)(C) and (D); and substituted “Filings under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq.” for “In either event, the proposed rule or regulation”.

The 2015 amendment rewrote the section heading and the section.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment substituted “that include” for “including” in the introductory language of (b)(2)(B); and added “Except as provided in §§10-3-3102 and27-65-107(a)(18)(A)” to the beginning of (b)(2)(B)(ii).

The 2017 amendment by No. 605 added (b)(1)(B)(iv).

The 2017 amendment by No. 707 substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (b)(2)(B)(ii).

The 2017 amendment by No. 820 redesignated former (c)(3)(B)(i) and (c)(3)(B)(ii) as (c)(3)(B)(i)(a) and (c)(3)(B)(i)(b) ; added “Except as set forth in subdivision (c)(3)(B)(ii) of this section” in (c)(3)(B)(i)(a) ; added (c)(3)(B)(ii); redesignated former (c)(4)(A) and (c)(4)(B) as (c)(4)(A)(i) and (c)(4)(A)(ii); added “Except as set forth in subdivision (c)(4)(B) of this section” in (c)(4)(A)(i); added (c)(4)(B); and added (f)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “Administrative Rules Subcommittee” for “Administrative Rules and Regulations Subcommittee” throughout the section; and substituted “Administrative Rule Review Subcommittee” for “Administrative Rule and Regulation Review Subcommittee” throughout the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 319 added (c)(5).

Cross References. Rulemaking power to be narrowly interpreted, §25-15-220.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Pursuant to §10-3-303(b), the Executive Secretary to the Legislative Council is the Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “annual” for “biennial” in (a)(2).

History.

Acts 1983, No. 78, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-628, 4-629; Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 14; 2009, No. 962, § 18.

10-3-309. Review and approval of state agency rules — Definitions.

(1)(A)In the passage of this section, the General Assembly is aware of the significant number of laws which have been enacted granting to boards, commissions, departments, and administrative agencies of state government the authority to promulgate and enforce rules.

The General Assembly is further aware that ample safeguards have not been established whereby the General Assembly may be informed of circumstances in which administrative rules do not conform to legislative intent.

It is the purpose of this section to establish a method for continuing legislative review and approval of such rules to correct abuses of rulemaking authority or clarify legislative intent with respect to the rulemaking authority granted the administrative boards, commissions, departments, or agencies.

As used in this section:

(A)“State agency” means an office, board, commission, department, council, bureau, or other agency of state government having authority to promulgate or enforce rules.

“State agency” does not include the following unless the Legislative Council adopts rules under subsection (h) of this section that include one (1) or more of the following in the definition of “state agency”:

The Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, if the rule is not promulgated under authority of a statute enacted by the General Assembly;

Except as provided in §10-3-3102 and §27-65-107(a)(18)(A), the State Highway Commission and the Arkansas Department of Transportation, if the rule is not promulgated under authority of a statute enacted by the General Assembly; and

An institution of higher education.

(1)A state agency shall file a proposed rule with the Legislative Council at least thirty (30) days before the expiration of the period for public comment on the rule under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq., or other laws or policies pertaining to the rulemaking authority of that state agency.

The Legislative Council shall assign proposed rules to the Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council.

(A)(i)The proposed rule shall be reviewed by the Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council.

When reviewing a rule under subdivision (c)(3)(A)(i) of this section, the Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council shall allow members of the public a reasonable opportunity to comment on the proposed rule.

(i)(a)Except as set forth in subdivision (c)(3)(B)(ii) of this section, upon conclusion of the review of the proposed rule by the Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council, the proposed rule shall be considered approved unless a majority of a quorum present request that the Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council vote on the issue of approving the proposed rule.

If the Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council votes on the issue of approving the proposed rule, the proposed rule shall be approved unless a majority of a quorum present vote for the proposed rule to not be approved.

A proposed rule submitted by the State Board of Health under §20-7-604(d)(2)(D), concerning exemptions from the requirements of the Prescription Drug Monitoring Program, shall be considered reviewed and approved by the Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council upon an affirmative vote of three-fourths (3/4) of the members present when a quorum is present.

(A)(i)Except as set forth in subdivision (c)(4)(B) of this section, a proposed rule approved by the Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council shall be considered approved by the Legislative Council unless a majority of a quorum present request that the Legislative Council vote on the issue of approving the proposed rule.

If the Legislative Council votes on the issue of approving the proposed rule, the proposed rule shall be approved unless a majority of a quorum present vote for the proposed rule to not be approved.

A proposed rule submitted by the State Board of Health under §20-7-604(d)(2)(D), concerning exemptions from the requirements of the Prescription Drug Monitoring Program, shall be considered reviewed and approved by the Legislative Council upon an affirmative vote of three-fourths (¾) of the members present when a quorum is present.

(A)(i)If enacted legislation requires or results in more than one (1) state agency adopting, amending, or repealing rules on a similar subject matter:

A state agency may request that all proposed rules filed with the Legislative Council regarding the enacted legislation be grouped together and reviewed and approved as a single group; or

A member of the General Assembly may request that all proposed rules filed with the Legislative Council regarding the enacted legislation be grouped together and reviewed and approved as a single group.

If the proposed rules are grouped together under subdivision (c)(5)(A)(i) of this section, the proposed rules may be reviewed and approved as a single group by any of the following, as appropriate:

The Legislative Council;

The Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council;

The Joint Budget Committee; or

The Administrative Rule Review Subcommittee of the Joint Budget Committee.

If the proposed rules are grouped together under subdivision (c)(5)(A)(i) of this section for review, the Legislative Council, the Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council, the Joint Budget Committee, or the Administrative Rule Review Subcommittee of the Joint Budget Committee, as appropriate, may:

Separate the proposed rules if requested by:

A member of the General Assembly; or

One (1) of the state agencies that promulgated the proposed rules; and

Elect to approve one (1) or more of the proposed rules separated under subdivision (c)(5)(B)(i) of this section.

(1)A state agency shall file a proposed emergency rule with the Executive Subcommittee of the Legislative Council.

A proposed emergency rule shall be considered approved by the Executive Subcommittee of the Legislative Council if:

(i)The proposed emergency rule is reviewed and approved at a meeting of the Executive Subcommittee of the Legislative Council.

After the review of a proposed emergency rule at a meeting of the Executive Subcommittee of the Legislative Council, the proposed emergency rule shall be considered approved unless a majority of a quorum present request that the Executive Subcommittee of the Legislative Council vote on the issue of approving the proposed emergency rule.

If the Executive Subcommittee of the Legislative Council votes on the issue of approving the proposed emergency rule, the proposed emergency rule shall be approved unless a majority of a quorum present vote for the proposed emergency rule to not be approved; or

(i)A majority or more of the members of the Executive Subcommittee of the Legislative Council approve the proposed emergency rule in writing.

An approval in writing of a proposed emergency rule under subdivision (d)(2)(B)(i) of this section shall not constitute a meeting under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.

A proposed emergency rule approved by the Executive Subcommittee of the Legislative Council shall be reported to the Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council.

(1)The Joint Budget Committee shall establish the Administrative Rule Review Subcommittee.

(A)The Administrative Rule Review Subcommittee shall consist of twenty-two (22) members of the General Assembly.

(i)Nine (9) members of the Administrative Rule Review Subcommittee shall be appointed by the Senate Cochair of the Joint Budget Committee.

The Senate Cochair of the Joint Budget Committee shall designate one (1) of his or her appointees as Senate Cochair of the Administrative Rule Review Subcommittee.

(i)Nine (9) members of the Administrative Rule Review Subcommittee shall be appointed by the House Cochair of the Joint Budget Committee.

The House Cochair of the Joint Budget Committee shall designate one (1) of his or her appointees as House Cochair of the Administrative Rule Review Subcommittee.

The cochairs and co-vice chairs of the Legislative Council shall be ex officio members of the Administrative Rule Review Subcommittee.

(A)The Administrative Rule Review Subcommittee may meet only during a regular, fiscal, or extraordinary session of the General Assembly.

The Administrative Rule Review Subcommittee shall meet at the call of the cochairs of the Administrative Rule Review Subcommittee.

(A)During a regular, fiscal, or extraordinary session of the General Assembly:

The Administrative Rule Review Subcommittee shall perform the functions assigned to the Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council under this section; and

The Joint Budget Committee shall perform the functions assigned to the Legislative Council under this section.

Actions taken by the Administrative Rule Review Subcommittee and the Joint Budget Committee under this subsection have the same effect as actions taken by the Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council and the Legislative Council under this section.

The Joint Budget Committee shall file a report of its actions under this subsection with the Legislative Council as soon as practicable.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 583, §§ 1, 2, 4-6; 1979, No. 136, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 6-608, 6-608n, 6-610 — 6-612; Acts 1987, No. 85, § 1; 1995, No. 884, §§ 4, 5; 1995, No. 1104, § 2; 1997, No. 1354, § 15; 2001, No. 983, § 1; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 38, § 2; 2011, No. 273, § 1; 2013, No. 759, § 2; 2015, No. 1258, § 13; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 1, § 2; 2017, No. 605, § 1; 2017, No. 707, § 12; 2017, No. 820, §§ 6, 7; 2019, No. 315, §§ 736-742; 2019, No. 319, § 3.

10-3-310. Compensation of executive secretary and employees — Cooperation with Council of State Governments — Reimbursement.

(1)The Executive Secretary to the Legislative Council shall be entitled to such salary as may be authorized by appropriation of the General Assembly.

All other employees of the Legislative Council shall receive such remuneration as may be provided by the annual appropriations.

The Legislative Council is authorized to cooperate with the Council of State Governments and with national and regional organizations established to study governmental problems and may authorize one (1) or more of its members to attend the meetings thereof which the Legislative Council deems appropriate. Any member of the Legislative Council attending the meetings shall be reimbursed only for actual and reasonable expenses for transportation, meals, lodging, and other necessary expenses.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 264, § 8; 1963, No. 253, § 1; 1969, No. 139, § 1; 1975, No. 929, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-624; Acts 2015, No. 1150, § 2.

10-3-311. Gifts and donations.

The Legislative Council is authorized to accept gifts, grants, contributions, and donations from the federal government or from private persons, associations, or corporations for use in making studies and in performing the functions and duties of the Legislative Council as prescribed by law.

History.

Acts 1961 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 41, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-627.

10-3-312. Notification of lawsuits affecting state.

In order that the General Assembly may take whatever steps it deems necessary concerning lawsuits which may affect the State of Arkansas, its officials, or its financial resources:

The Attorney General shall notify the Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research who is the Executive Secretary to the Legislative Council as soon as possible after the Attorney General becomes involved in such litigation;

When any state agency or any entity which receives an appropriation of funds from the General Assembly becomes involved in litigation without representation by the Attorney General, the director or administrative head of the agency shall notify the Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research as soon as possible.

The notice given by the Attorney General or by the director or administrative head of a state agency to the Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research shall include the style of the case being litigated, the identity of the tribunal before which the matter has been filed, a brief description of the issues involved, and other information that will enable the Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee to determine the action that may be deemed necessary to protect the interests of the General Assembly and the State of Arkansas in that matter.

Upon receipt of the notice, the Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research shall during the interim between legislative sessions transmit a copy of the notice to the cochairs of the Legislative Council and to the cochairs of the Joint Budget Committee during legislative sessions in order that those committees may schedule that matter upon their respective agendas at the earliest possible date.

During the interim between legislative sessions, the Legislative Council shall determine, and during legislative sessions the Joint Budget Committee shall determine, whether the General Assembly has an interest in the litigation and, if so, take whatever action deemed necessary to protect the General Assembly's and the state's interest in that matter.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Administrative Rules Subcommittee” for “Administrative Rules and Regulations Subcommittee” in (a)(1).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning report on claim filed with Arkansas State Claims Commission, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1161, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1995, No. 607, § 27; 1995, No. 993, § 9; 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 16, § 20; 1997, No. 264, § 1; 2009, No. 605, § 13; 2009, No. 606, § 13; 2011, No. 777, § 1.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 798, §§ 1, 2.

10-3-313. Meetings — Agenda — Procedures and practices.

(1)The Review Subcommittee of the Legislative Council, the Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council, and the Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review Subcommittee of the Legislative Council shall each meet monthly on a date approximately two (2) weeks preceding the date on which regular meetings of the interim committees are held.

At the meetings, the respective subcommittees shall screen the various matters required by law to be submitted to the Legislative Council by the state agencies and which have heretofore been referred to the respective subcommittees by the Legislative Council and shall determine which of such matters need further review and which are routine and need no further review or both.

Those matters which the respective subcommittees determine need further review shall be referred to the respective subject matter interim committee, which committee referral shall be made by the subcommittee after taking into consideration the committee which is usually assigned such matters by the respective houses as well as the workload of the various interim committees, it being the intent to allow as much meaningful participation by the members in as many committees as possible.

(1)(A)At the next regular meeting of an interim committee, all matters referred to the committee by the Legislative Council or appropriate subcommittee of the Legislative Council shall be placed on the agenda for review by the committee.

When any member of the General Assembly submits any proposal or issue to the Legislative Council for legislative study or review or input, the Legislative Council shall refer the matter as follows:

If the proposal states a preference on referral, the proposal shall be referred to the committee of preference unless the proposal is clearly not germane to that committee as determined by the Legislative Council;

If the proposal was initiated by the Legislative Council or by a member of the Legislative Council, the Legislative Council may appoint a subcommittee to conduct such study; and

All other proposals shall be assigned to the appropriate interim committee.

Notice that such item is being placed on the meeting agenda of the interim committee may be furnished to the various state agencies involved upon direction of the cochairs of the interim committee in order that the agency may be represented at the interim committee meeting to explain the item and to answer questions in regard thereto if raised by the committee.

Upon conclusion of the committee's consideration of an item, the committee or designated subcommittee thereof shall notify the state agency that it has completed its review of the item.

The purpose of this subsection is to enable appropriate interim committees of the General Assembly and the various state agencies to jointly discuss the various matters referred to the respective committees in order to enable the committees to perform a legislative oversight function of keeping the General Assembly informed with respect to activities of the various agencies and to enable state agencies to receive the benefit of recommendations and comments of the respective interim committees concerning various actions or proposed actions of the agencies.

The respective interim committees of the General Assembly are hereby authorized to adopt appropriate procedures and practices, including the utilization of subcommittees, to enable each committee to carry out its responsibilities under the provisions of this section.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1055, §§ 13-15, 19; 1997, No. 1354, § 16; 2019, No. 315, § 743.

10-3-314. [Repealed.]

For purposes of this section, “state agency” means every department, division, office, board, commission, and institution of this state, including state-supported institutions of higher education.

Every state agency shall provide the Bureau of Legislative Research with information, records, and access to electronic databases and files when requested by the bureau, unless prohibited by federal or state law.

Information and records requested by the bureau shall be provided as soon as possible and in whatever reasonable form, hard copy, electronic, etc., requested.

State agencies shall also make their staff reasonably accessible for consultation with bureau staff.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1312, § 9; 1997, No. 1285, § 11.

10-3-316. Charitable, Penal and Correctional Institutions Subcommittee.

The cochairs of the Legislative Council shall appoint a member of the Senate Committee on City, County, and Local Affairs and a member of the House Committee on City, County, and Local Affairs to serve as members of the Charitable, Penal and Correctional Institutions Subcommittee of the Legislative Council.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1285, § 24.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The reference to “§10-3-301 et seq.” in §10-3-203 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.